Illinois, session 104th, SB4183.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to Youth 8Guidance for costs associated with contingent and operational 9expenses. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.